dictionaries/gl_ES/src/gl_ES.dic
A/1001,1002,1003
b/1001,1004
B/1001,1004
Bq/1001,1002,1003
C/1001,1002,1003
desempedernir/658,659,858,859
empedernir/658,659,858,859
F/1001,1002,1003
g/1001,1002,1003
gorir/658,659,858,859
guarir/658,659,858,859
Gy/1001,1002,1003
H/1001,1002,1003
Hz/1001,1002,1003
J/1001,1002,1003
K/1001,1002,1003
kat/1001,1002,1003
lm/1001,1002,1003
lx/1001,1002,1003
m/1001,1002,1003
magnet/1011
manir/858,859
N/1001,1002,1003
Pa/1001,1002,1003
s/1001,1002,1003
S/1001,1002,1003
socket/1011
sr/1001,1002,1003
Sv/1001,1002,1003
T/1001,1002,1003
torrent/1011
V/1001,1002,1003
W/1001,1002,1003
Wb/1001,1002,1003
Ω/1001,1002,1003
